Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.70.050

Exemption from nonresident tuition fees differential.

When said compact becomes operative the governing board of each institution of higher education in this state, to the extent necessary to conform with the terms of the contractual agreement, subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, may exempt from payment all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential, any student admitted to such institution under the terms of a contractual agreement entered into with the commission in accord with the provisions of Article VIII(a) of the compact.

[ 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 33; 1992 c 231 s 30; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.70.050. Prior: 1955 c 214 s 5. Formerly RCW 28.82.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.